Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5494.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 256. (1) The department, the state administrative board, or any other person acting on behalf of this state shall not convey real property of this state to the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or to any subsidiary of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. (2) A conveyance of property of this state by the department, the state administrative board, or any other person acting on behalf of this state must contain a restriction on use of the property, prohibiting the property from being used as an immigration detention center by the federal government or by a person that is not a governmental entity that contracts with the federal government. A conveyance under this subsection must contain provisions allowing this state to regain the property conveyed if the restriction is violated. (3) A conveyance of property contrary to this section is void and of no legal effect.